fr: Type de tissu recommandé: Toile; Coton/tissé (coton à matelasser); Denim; Similicuir/vinyle; Feutre; Tissu polaire; Tricot (jersey); Cuir; Lin; Soie/satin; Tricot extensible; Tissu d'ameublement; Laine; Autre
zh-CN: 推荐面料类型: 帆布; 棉/机织物（绗缝棉）; 牛仔布; 人造皮革/乙烯基; 毛毡; 抓绒; 针织布 (平纹布); 皮革; 亚麻; 真丝/缎子; 弹力针织布; 室内装潢面料; 羊毛; 其他
en: Recommended fabric type: Canvas; Cotton/woven (quilting cotton); Denim; Faux leather/vinyl; Felt; Fleece; Knit (jersey); Leather; Linen; Silk/satin; Stretch knit; Upholstery fabric; Wool; Other
sv: Rekommenderad typ av tyg: Canvas; Bomull/vävt (kviltbomull); Jeanstyg; Konstläder/vinyl; Filt; Fleece; Stickat (jersey); Läder; Linne; Siden/satäng; Stretchigt stickat; Möbeltyg; Ull; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de material textil recomandat: Pânză canvas; Bumbac/țesătură (bumbac pentru matlasare); Denim; Piele artificială/vinil; Feltru; Fleece; Tricot (jerseu); Piele; In; Mătase/satin; Tricot elastic; Material pentru tapițerie; Lână; Altele
el: Προτεινόμενος τύπος υφάσματος: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι/υφαντό (βαμβάκι για καπιτονέ); Τζιν; Συνθετικό δέρμα/βινύλιο; Τσόχα; Φλις; Πλεκτό (ζέρσεϊ); Δέρμα; Λινό; Μετάξι/σατέν; Ελαστικό πλεκτό; Ύφασμα επιπλοποιίας; Μαλλί; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de tecido recomendado: Lona; Algodão/tecido (algodão para acolchoados); Ganga; Imitação de pele/vinil; Feltro; Polar; Malha (jersey); Pele; Linho; Seda/cetim; Malha elástica; Tecido para estofos; Lã; Outro
bg-BG: Препоръчителен тип плат: Канвас (платно); Памук/тъкан (памук за пачуърк); Деним; Изкуствена кожа/винил; Филц; Полар; Плетиво (жарсе); Кожа; Лен; Коприна/сатен; Еластично плетиво; Плат за тапицерия; Вълна; Други
fi: Suositeltu kangastyyppi: Kanvas; Puuvilla/kudottu (tilkkutyöpuuvilla); Farkkukangas; Tekonahka/vinyyli; Huopa; Fleece; Neulos (trikoo); Nahka; Pellava; Silkki/satiini; Joustava neulos; Verhoilukangas; Villa; Muu
hr-HR: Preporučena vrsta tkanine: Platno; Pamuk/tkanina (pamuk za poplun); Traper; Umjetna koža / vinil; Filc; Flis; Pletivo (žersej); Koža; Lan; Svila/saten; Rastezljivo pletivo; Tkanina za tapeciranje; Vuna; Ostalo
ru: Рекомендуемый тип ткани: Канвас; Хлопок/ткань (хлопок для квилтинга); Джинсовая ткань; Искусственная кожа / винил; Фетр; Флис; Трикотаж (джерси); Кожа; Лен; Шелк/атлас; Стрейч-трикотаж; Обивочная ткань; Шерсть; Другое
ja: 推奨生地タイプ: キャンバス; コットン/織物 (キルティングコットン); デニム; 合成皮革/ビニール; フェルト; フリース; ニット (ジャージー); レザー; リネン; シルク/サテン; ストレッチニット; 椅子張り生地; ウール; その他
tr: Önerilen kumaş türü: Kanvas; Pamuklu/dokuma (kapitone pamuklu); Denim; Suni deri/vinil; Keçe; Polar; Örgü (jarse); Deri; Keten; İpek/saten; Streç örgü; Döşemelik kumaş; Yün; Diğer
cs: Doporučený typ tkaniny: Plátno; Bavlna/tkaná (patchworková bavlna); Denim; Umělá kůže/vinyl; Plsť; Fleece; Úplet (žerzej); Kůže; Len; Hedvábí/satén; Strečový úplet; Potahová látka; Vlna; Ostatní
it: Tipo di tessuto consigliato: Tela; Cotone/tessuto (cotone per trapunte); Denim; Finta pelle/vinile; Feltro; Pile; Maglia (jersey); Pelle; Lino; Seta/Raso; Maglia elasticizzata; Tessuto per tappezzeria; Lana; Altro
th: ประเภทผ้าที่แนะนำ: ผ้าใบ; ผ้าฝ้าย/ผ้าทอ (ผ้าฝ้ายสำหรับควิลท์); ผ้าเดนิม; หนังเทียม/ไวนิล; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าฟลีซ; ผ้าถัก (เจอร์ซีย์); หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ผ้าไหม/ซาติน; ผ้าถักยืดหยุ่น; ผ้าบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์; ขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de tela recomendado: Lona; Algodón/tejido (algodón para acolchado); Denim; Piel sintética/vinilo; Fieltro; Tejido polar; Punto (jersey); Cuero; Lino; Seda/satén; Punto elástico; Tela de tapicería; Lana; Otro
ko: 권장 패브릭 유형: 캔버스; 면/우븐(퀼트 면); 데님; 인조 가죽/비닐; 펠트; 플리스; 니트(저지); 가죽; 리넨; 실크/새틴; 스트레치 니트; 장식용 직물; 울; 기타
pt-BR: Tecido, tipo recomendado: Lona; Algodão/tecido plano (algodão para quilting); Jeans; Couro sintético/vinil; Feltro; Fleece; Malha (jersey); Couro; Linho; Seda/cetim; Malha com elastano; Tecido para estofamento; Lã; Outro
hu: Ajánlott szövettípus: Vászon; Pamut/szőtt (foltvarró pamut); Farmer; Műbőr/vinil; Filc; Polár; Kötött (dzsörzé); Bőr; Len; Selyem/szatén; Sztreccs kötött; Kárpitszövet; Gyapjú; Egyéb
zh-TW: 建議布料類型: 帆布; 棉布/梭織布 (絎縫棉); 丹寧; 人造皮革/乙烯基; 毛氈; 刷毛布; 針織布 (汗布); 皮革; 亞麻; 絲綢/緞面; 彈性針織布; 傢飾布; 羊毛; 其他
lt-LT: Rekomenduojamas audinio tipas: Drobė; Medvilnė / austas audinys (dygsniuota medvilnė); Džinsas; Dirbtinė oda / vinilas; Veltinis; Flisas; Trikotažas (džersis); Oda; Linas; Šilkas / satinas; Tamprus trikotažas; Baldinis audinys; Vilna; Kita
vi: Loại vải khuyến nghị: Vải bố (canvas); Cotton/Vải dệt (cotton chần mền); Denim; Giả da/Vinyl; Vải dạ; Vải nỉ bông; Vải dệt kim (jersey); Da; Lanh; Lụa/Satin; Vải dệt kim co giãn; Vải bọc nội thất; Len; Khác
pl: Zalecany typ materiału: Płótno (canvas); Bawełna/tkanina (bawełna do pikowania); Denim; Sztuczna skóra/winyl; Filc; Polar; Dzianina (dżersej); Skóra; Len; Jedwab/satyna; Dzianina ze stretchem; Tkanina obiciowa; Wełna; Inne
nl: Aanbevolen type stof: Canvas; Katoen/geweven (quiltkatoen); Denim; Imitatieleer/vinyl; Vilt; Fleece; Breisel (jersey); Leer; Linnen; Zijde/satijn; Stretch-breisel; Meubelstof; Wol; Overig
da: Anbefalet stoftype: Lærred; Bomuld/vævet (quiltet bomuld); Denim; Kunstlæder/vinyl; Filt; Fleece; Strik (jersey); Læder; Hør; Silke/satin; Elastisk strik; Møbelstof; Uld; Andet
sk-SK: Odporúčaný typ látky: Plátno; Bavlna/tkanina (bavlna na prešívanie); Džínsovina; Umelá koža/vinyl; Plsť; Flís; Úplet (džersej); Koža; Ľan; Hodváb/satén; Elastický úplet; Poťahová látka; Vlna; Iné
de: Empfohlener Gewebetyp: Canvas; Baumwolle/Gewebe (Quilt-Baumwolle); Denim; Kunstleder/Vinyl; Filz; Fleece; Strick (Jersey); Leder; Leinen; Seide/Satin; Stretch-Strick; Polsterstoff; Wolle; Sonstige
sl-SI: Priporočena vrsta tkanine: Platno; Bombaž/tkanina (bombaž za prešite odeje); Denim; Umetno usnje/vinil; Filc; Flis; Pletenina (jersey); Usnje; Lan; Svila/saten; Raztegljiva pletenina; Tkanina za oblazinjenje; Volna; Drugo
nb: Anbefalt stofftype: Lerret; Bomull/vevd (quiltebomull); Denim; Kunstskinn/vinyl; Filt; Fleece; Strikket (jersey); Skinn; Lin; Silke/sateng; Elastisk strikk; Møbelstoff; Ull; Annet